Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-424.02
PACE program, defined.

PACE program means a program of all-inclusive care for elderly under 42 U.S.C. 1396u-4, as such section existed on January 1, 2020.

Laws 2020, LB1053, § 11.